Missouri, session 2026, SB1646.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 94.815, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 94.815,
to read as follows:
94.815. 1. All taxes authorized and collected under
sections 94.800 to 94.825 shall be deposited by the
municipality in a special trust fund to be known as the
"Tourism Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in such tourism tax
trust fund shall not be commingled with any funds of the
municipality.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section,
seventy-five percent of the taxes collected shall be
deposited in an "Infrastructure Account" within the tourism
tax trust fund and shall be used, upon appropriation by the
municipality, solely for the purpose of constructing and
maintaining tourism infrastructure facilities and
infrastructure improvements, [to include] including, but not
limited to, sidewalks, streets, highways, roads, parks,
waterworks, wastewater including distribution and collection
systems and solid waste disposal facilities, the costs of
which may be funded by issuing bonds which may be retired by
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1646 2
revenues received from tourism taxes imposed pursuant to
sections 94.802 and 94.805 or the retirement of debt under
previously voter-approved bonded indebtedness and the costs
of operation and maintenance of such infrastructure
improvements. Moneys in the infrastructure account may also
be used for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, and
maintaining structures, trails, and any other facilities for
the purpose of promoting tourism, the costs of which may be
funded by issuing bonds as provided in this section.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section, if any outstanding bonds have been issued or
indebtedness has been incurred prior to or after September
15, 1997, for the purpose of constructing and maintaining
infrastructure improvements, including sidewalks, streets,
highways, roads, waterworks, wastewater including
distribution and collection systems and solid waste disposal
facilities, then a portion of the seventy-five percent of
the collected taxes to be deposited in the infrastructure
account pursuant to subsection 2 of this section shall
instead be deposited in a "Debt Retirement Account" within
the tourism tax trust fund. The portion of the seventy-five
percent of collected taxes to be deposited in the debt
retirement account and the administration of such account
shall be pursuant to section 94.820.
4. Twenty-five percent of the taxes collected shall be
deposited into a "Tourism Promotion Account" within the
tourism tax trust fund and shall be used, upon appropriation
by the municipality, for tourism marketing and promotional
purposes.
5. The tourism taxes authorized by sections 94.802 and
94.805 shall be in addition to any and all other taxes
allowed by law, but no ordinance imposing a tax under

SB 1646 3
sections 94.802 and 94.805 shall be effective unless the
governing body of the municipality submits to the voters of
the municipality at an election permitted pursuant to
section 115.123 a proposal to authorize the governing body
of the municipality to impose such tax and, if such tax is
to be used to retire bonds authorized under this section, to
authorize such bonds and their retirement by such tax or
charge or to authorize the retirement of debt under
previously voter-approved bonded indebtedness.
6. As used in this section, "tourism infrastructure
facilities" shall mean structures, fixtures, systems, and
facilities of multipurpose sports and entertainment venues
with seating capacity of less than twenty-five thousand,
including associated parking facilities, owned or operated
by any public body and which the municipality determines are
a contributing factor in the attraction of sports,
recreational, entertainment, or meeting activities, either
professional or amateur, commercial or private. Such
structures, fixtures, systems, and facilities may include,
but are not limited to, foundations, roofs, interior and
exterior walls or windows, floors, steps, stairs,
concourses, hallways, restrooms, event or meeting spaces or
other hospitality-related areas, concession or food
preparation areas, and services systems.
✓